Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1702
Accused a nonresident of the county; how arrested.

When the party accused shall reside out of the county in which such indictment was found, it shall be lawful to issue a warrant thereon, directed to the sheriff of the county where the accused shall reside or may be found. It shall be the duty of such officer to arrest the accused and convey him to the county from which such writ was issued, and there commit him to the jail of such county, or hold him to bail, as provided in section 29-1701.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 427, p. 819;

R.S.1913, § 9071;

C.S.1922, § 10095;

C.S.1929, § 29-1702;

R.S.1943, § 29-1702.

Fact that accused is out on bail pending trial for felony in one county does not render him immune from arrest on charge of separate felony in another county. State ex rel. Johnson v. Goble, 136 Neb. 242, 285 N.W. 569 (1939).